Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Registry of Election Finance

121.100.
Applicability
of statutes. [Repealed.]

121.110.
Registry
of Election Finance — Membership — Terms — Meetings —
Compensation.

There is hereby created as an independent agency of state government a Kentucky Registry of Election Finance. The registry shall be composed of seven (7) members appointed as provided herein. The registry shall remain independent of any other agency or department of state government. Members shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age, registered voters in Kentucky, not announced candidates for public office, not officers of a political party’s state central executive committee, shall not have been convicted of an election offense, and shall be persons of high ethical standards who have an active interest in promoting fair elections. Appointees shall be subject to Senate confirmation at the next regular session of the General Assembly following appointment, or at the next special session if included in the Governor’s call. Appointees shall have full power to serve until any vote of nonconfirmation.

Members of the registry shall be selected as follows:

One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the state central committee of the political party polling the largest vote at the last gubernatorial election.

One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the state central committee of the political party polling the second largest vote at the last gubernatorial election. The members appointed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall take office on August 15, 1990, for a term of one (1) year and their successors shall serve a term of four (4) years beginning August 15, 1991, or until their successors are appointed and qualified.

Two (2) other members shall be appointed by the Governor. Before making these appointments, the Governor shall solicit nominations from at least two (2) organizations which have demonstrated a nonpartisan interest in fair elections and informed voting. The Governor’s solicitations and the replies shall be public records. The Governor shall give due consideration to such nominations. The two (2) members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be one (1) from each of the two (2) political parties which polled the greatest number of votes at the last gubernatorial election. Members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1988, for a term of four (4) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified and their successors shall serve a term of four (4) years.

One (1) member shall be appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts after soliciting nominations as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The appointee shall be a member of one (1) of the two (2) political parties which polled the greatest number of votes at the last gubernatorial election. The member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1997, for a term of four (4) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four (4) years.

One (1) member shall be appointed by the Attorney General after soliciting nominations as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The appointee shall not be a member of the same political party as the person appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. The member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1990, for a term of four (4) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four (4) years.

One (1) member shall be appointed by the Secretary of State after soliciting nominations as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The Secretary of State’s appointment shall be without regard to political affiliation. The member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1990, for a term of three (3) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The members of the registry shall select a chairman from among the appointed membership, effective August 15, 1990. The chairman shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chairman shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of any member, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the vacating member’s office was filled pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

The registry shall fix the place and time of its regular meetings by order duly recorded in its minutes. No action shall be taken without a quorum present. Special meetings shall be called by the chairman on his own initiative or on the written request of three (3) members. Members shall receive seven (7) days’ written notice of a special meeting and the notice shall specify the purpose, time and place of the meeting, and no other matters may be considered, without a specific waiver by all the members.

The members of the registry shall receive sixty-five dollars ($65) per diem, and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 185; 1978, ch. 154, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 341, § 40, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 458, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

121.120.
Duties and powers of registry — Appointment of certain employees — Electronic reporting system — Mandatory electronic reporting of campaign finance reports.

The registry may:

Require by special or general orders, any person to submit, under oath, any written reports and answers to questions as the registry may prescribe;

Administer oaths or affirmations;

Require by subpoena, signed by the chair, the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all documentary evidence, excluding individual and business income tax records, relating to the execution of its duties;

In any proceeding or investigation, to order testimony to be taken by deposition before any person who is designated by the registry and has the power to administer oaths and, in those instances, to compel testimony and the production of evidence in the same manner as authorized under paragraph (c) of this subsection;

Initiate, through civil actions for injunctive, declaratory, or other appropriate relief, defend, or appeal any civil action in the name of the registry to enforce the provisions of this chapter through its legal counsel;

Render advisory opinions under KRS

121.135

;

Promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

Conduct investigations and hearings expeditiously, to encourage voluntary compliance, and report apparent campaign finance law violations to the appropriate law enforcement authorities;

Petition any court of competent jurisdiction to issue an order requiring compliance with an order or subpoena issued by the registry. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt; and

Conduct random audits of receipts and expenditures of committees which have filed registration papers with the registry pursuant to KRS

121.170

.

No person shall be subject to civil liability to any person other than the registry or the Commonwealth for disclosing information at the request of the registry.

The registry may appoint a full-time executive director, legal counsel, and an accountant for auditing purposes, all of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the registry. The registry may also appoint such other employees as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All requests for personnel appointments shall be forwarded by the registry directly to the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet and shall be subject to the secretary’s review and certification only.

The registry shall adopt official forms and perform other duties necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. The registry shall not require the listing of a person’s Social Security number on any form developed by the registry. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the registry shall:

Develop prescribed forms for the making of the required reports;

Prepare and publish a manual for all candidates, slates of candidates, contributing organizations, and committees, describing the requirements of the law, including uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting, requirements as to reporting dates, and the length of time that candidates, slates of candidates, contributing organizations, and committees are required to keep any records pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

Develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing system;

Make each report filed available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours at the expense of any person requesting copies of them;

Preserve all reports for at least six (6) years from the date of receipt. Duly certified reports shall be admissible as evidence in any court in the Commonwealth;

Prepare and make available for public inspection a summary of all reports grouped according to candidates, slates of candidates, committees, contributing organizations, and parties containing the total receipts and expenditures; and

For each contribution made by a permanent committee of any amount to a candidate or slate of candidates, the date, name, and business address of the permanent committee, the amount contributed, and a description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee; and

For each contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) made to any candidate or campaign committee, the date, name, address, occupation, and employer of each other contributor or, if the contributor is self-employed, the name under which the contributor is doing business, and the amount contributed by each contributor, listed alphabetically;

Prepare and publish an annual report with cumulative compilations named in paragraph (f) of this subsection;

Distribute upon request, for a nominal fee, copies of all summaries and reports;

Determine whether the required reports have been filed and if so, whether they conform with the requirements of this chapter; give notice to delinquents to correct or explain defections; issue an order, if appropriate, as provided in KRS

121.140

; and make public the fact that a violation has occurred and the nature thereof;

Conduct random audits of receipts and expenditures of candidates running for city, county, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, and district offices. When the registry audits the records of any selected candidate, it shall also audit the records of all other candidates running for the same office in the selected city, county, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, or district office;

Conduct audits of receipts and expenditures of all candidates or slates of candidates running for statewide office;

Require that candidates and slates of candidates shall maintain their records for a period of six (6) years from the date of the regular election in their respective political races;

Initiate investigations and make investigations with respect to reports upon complaint by any person and initiate proceedings on its own motion; and

Forward to the Attorney General or the appropriate Commonwealth’s or county attorney any violations of this chapter which may become the subject of civil or criminal prosecution.

All policy and enforcement decisions concerning the regulation of campaign finance shall be the ultimate responsibility of the registry. No appointed or elected state officeholder or any other person shall, directly or indirectly, attempt to secure or create privileges, exemptions, or advantages for himself, herself, or others in derogation of the public interest at large in a manner that seeks to leave any registry member or employee charged with the enforcement of the campaign finance laws no alternative but to comply with the wishes of the officeholder or person. Registry members and employees shall be free of obligation or the appearance of obligation to any interest other than the fair and efficient enforcement of the campaign finance laws and administrative regulations. It shall not be considered a violation of this subsection for an officeholder or other person to seek remedies in a court of law to any policy or enforcement decision he or she considers to be an abridgement of his or her legal rights.

If adequate and appropriate agency funds are available, the registry shall:

Develop or acquire a system for electronic reporting for use by individuals and entities required to file campaign finance reports with the registry under this chapter. The registry shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A which provide for a nonproprietary standardized format or formats, using industry standards, for the transmission of data required under this chapter;

Accept test files from software vendors and persons wishing to file reports electronically for the purpose of determining whether the file format complies with the nonproprietary standardized format developed under paragraph (a) of this subsection and is compatible with the registry’s system for receiving the data;

Make all reports filed with the registry pertaining to candidates for the General Assembly and statewide office available on the Internet free of charge, in an easily understood format that allows the public to browse, search, and download the data contained in the reports by each of the reporting categories required by this chapter, including but not limited to:

The name of each candidate or committee;

The office sought by each candidate;

The name of each contributor;

The address of each contributor;

The employer or business occupation of each contributor, or if the contributor is a permanent committee, a description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee;

The date of each contribution; and

The amount of each contribution;

Make all data specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection available on the Internet no later than ten (10) business days after its receipt by the registry. If a contribution or expenditure report is filed late with the registry, that data shall be made available on the Internet within twenty-four (24) hours of the registry’s receipt of the data;

Make filer-side software available free of charge to all individuals or entities subject to the reporting requirements of this chapter;

Establish a training program on the electronic reporting program and make it available free of charge to all individuals and entities subject to the reporting requirements of this chapter;

Maintain all campaign finance data pertaining to legislative and statewide candidates on-line for twenty (20) years after the date the report containing the data is filed, and then archive the data in a secure format;

Require candidates and slates of candidates running for statewide office, and campaign committees of candidates and slates of candidates registered to run for statewide office, beginning with elections scheduled in 2015, to electronically report all campaign finance reports that must be submitted to the registry under this chapter. If any statewide candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee of a statewide candidate or slate of candidates submits a campaign finance report in a nonelectronic format for an election scheduled in 2015 or later, the registry shall require the statewide candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee of the statewide candidate or slate of candidates to resubmit the campaign finance report in an electronic format;

Require all candidates, slates of candidates, committees, and contributing organizations, beginning with the primary scheduled in 2020, and for each subsequent election scheduled thereafter, to electronically report all campaign finance reports required to be submitted to the registry under this chapter. If any candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization submits a campaign finance report to the registry in a nonelectronic format for an election or calendar period beginning in 2020 or later, the registry shall require the candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization to resubmit the campaign finance report in an electronic format. If any candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization does not submit the required campaign finance reports electronically by the applicable filing deadline, the registry shall publish the candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization’s name as a delinquent filer until such time as the campaign finance report is properly filed in an electronic format; and

Require all independent expenditure reports to be submitted electronically within forty-eight (48) hours of the date that the communication is publicly distributed or otherwise publicly disseminated, beginning with the primary scheduled in 2020, and for each subsequent election scheduled thereafter.

In conjunction with the program of electronic reporting set out in subsection (6) of this section, the registry shall deem an electronic report to be filed when submitted by either of the following methods:

Online Internet transmission; or

Hand delivery of the electronic report, saved on a current and compatible computer component, and downloaded at the registry.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 186; 1980, ch. 292, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 41, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, § 44, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 56, effective November 3, 1993; 1994, ch. 458, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 155, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 240, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 252, § 1, effective January 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 154, § 75, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 398, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 105, § 4, effective March 16, 2005; 2012, ch. 48, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 2, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 208, § 6, effective April 14, 2022.

121.130.
Dissemination
of information to candidates, treasurers, depositories and general public.

The registry shall take such steps as may be necessary to furnish timely and adequate information to every candidate or prospective candidate for public office who becomes or is likely to become subject to the provisions of this chapter. The registry shall also take such steps as are necessary to inform every treasurer and depository duly designated under this chapter of their actual obligations and responsibilities under this chapter.

The registry shall take such steps to disseminate among the general public such information as may serve to guide all persons who may become subject to the provisions of this chapter by reason of their participation in election campaigns or in the dissemination of political information, for the purpose of facilitating voluntary compliance with the provisions and purposes of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 253, § 2.

121.135.
Advisory
opinion by registry — Effect — Publication.

Any person may file a written request with the registry for an advisory opinion concerning the application of the provisions of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated by the registry with respect to a specific transaction or activity by the person. The registry shall render a written advisory opinion relating to the specific transaction or activity to the person making the request not later than thirty (30) days after the registry receives the request.

If a candidate, slate of candidates, or either of their campaign committees files a written request with the registry for an advisory opinion not more than thirty (30) days before the date of an election at which the candidate or slate of candidates shall appear on the ballot, the registry shall render a written advisory opinion relating to the request not later than twenty (20) days after the registry receives a complete request.

No advisory opinion shall be issued by the registry or any of its employees except in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Any advisory opinion rendered by the registry under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be relied upon only by the person or committee involved in the specific transaction or activity with respect to which the advisory opinion is rendered.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person or committee to whom a written advisory opinion has been rendered who relies upon any provision or finding of the advisory opinion and who acts in good faith in accordance with the provisions and findings of the advisory opinion shall not, as a result of any act with respect to a transaction or activity addressed by the advisory opinion, be subject to any sanction provided by this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated by the registry.

It shall be no defense in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding a violation of any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated by the registry for a person or committee to claim that he relied upon and acted in good faith based upon any provision or finding of an advisory opinion if the person or committee was not the person or committee involved in the specific transaction or activity with respect to which the advisory opinion was rendered.

The registry shall make public all written requests for an advisory opinion made under subsection (1) or (2) of this section. Before rendering an advisory opinion, the registry shall accept written comments submitted by any interested party within the ten (10) day period following the date the request is made public.

The registry shall make public all advisory opinions rendered under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 288, § 45, effective July 14, 1992.

121.140.
Investigation
of complaint — Conciliation agreement hearing — Decision and order
— Appeal from order — Reference for possible prosecution —
Judicial review.

Upon the sworn complaint of any person, or on its own initiative, the registry shall investigate alleged violations of campaign finance law. In conducting any investigation, the registry shall have the power of subpoena and may compel production of evidence including the financial records of any person determined by the registry to be vital to the investigation. The records subject to subpoena include, but are not limited to, a person’s bank records and other relevant documents, but excluding individual and business income tax records.

If the registry concludes that there is probable cause to believe that the law has been violated, the registry shall notify the alleged violator of its conclusions and the evidence supporting them, and shall offer the alleged violator a conciliation agreement to resolve the issue. A conciliation agreement may require the alleged violator to comply with one (1) or more of the following:

To cease and desist violations of the law;

To file required reports or other documents or information;

To pay a penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) a day, up to a maximum total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), for failure to file any report, payment of an administrative fee, or other document or information required by law until the report, fee payment, document, or information is filed; except that there shall be no maximum total fine for candidates for statewide office; or

To pay a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for acts of noncompliance with provisions contained within this chapter.

To accept a conciliation agreement, an alleged violator shall deliver the signed agreement to the registry either in person or by mail postmarked not later than ten (10) days after the day he received it. The registry may institute a civil action in Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court for the county of the violator’s residence to enforce the provisions of any conciliation agreement accepted by a violator who is not complying with its provisions.

If the alleged violator declines to accept the conciliation agreement or fails to respond within the time allowed, the registry shall submit a written request to the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court to recommend not fewer than five (5) nor more than ten (10) retired or former justices or retired or former judges of the Court of Justice who are qualified and willing to conduct a hearing to determine if a violation has occurred. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the Chief Justice, the registry shall randomly select one (1) retired or former justice or judge from the list to conduct the hearing, which shall be held in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure, or, if the Chief Justice declines to make recommendations, the registry, on its own initiative, shall request retired or former justices or judges to serve. The time and location of hearings shall be determined by the registry. Retired or former justices or judges selected to serve shall receive reimbursement from the registry for their reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of the performance of their duties at the hourly rate set for attorneys by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The registry shall notify the complainant and the alleged violator that a hearing shall be conducted of the specific offenses alleged not less than thirty (30) days prior to the date of the hearing. At the hearing, which shall be open to the public pursuant to KRS

61.810

, the attorney for the registry shall present the evidence against the alleged violator, and the alleged violator shall have all of the protections of due process, including, but not limited to, the right to be represented by counsel, the right to call and examine witnesses, the right to the production of evidence by subpoena, the right to introduce exhibits and the right to cross-examine opposing witnesses. If the justice or judge determines that the preponderance of the evidence shows a violation has occurred, the justice or judge shall render a decision not more than sixty (60) days after the case is submitted for determination. The decision shall become the final decision of the registry unless the registry board at its next regular meeting acts to set aside or modify the justice’s or judge’s decision, in which case the registry board’s decision shall become the final registry decision. A party adversely affected by the registry’s order may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after the date of the registry’s order. The violator may be ordered to comply with any one (1) or more of the following requirements:

To cease and desist violation of this law;

To file any reports or other documents or information required by this law;

To pay a penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) a day, up to a maximum total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), for failure to file any report, payment of an administrative fee, or other document or information required by law until the report, fee payment, document, or information is filed; except that there shall be no maximum total fine for candidates for statewide office; or

To pay a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for acts of noncompliance with provisions contained within this chapter. An appeal of an order shall be advanced on the docket to permit a timely decision.

If the registry concludes that there is probable cause to believe that the campaign finance law has been violated knowingly, it shall refer the violation to the Attorney General or the appropriate Commonwealth’s or county attorney for prosecution. The Attorney General may request the registry’s attorney or the appropriate county or Commonwealth’s attorney to prosecute the matter and may request from the registry all evidence collected in its investigation. In the event the Attorney General or the appropriate local prosecutor fails to prosecute in a timely fashion, the registry may petition the Circuit Court to appoint the registry’s attorney to prosecute, and upon a motion timely filed, for good cause shown, the court shall enter an order to that effect. Prosecutions involving campaign finance law violations, in which the reports are required to be filed in Frankfort, may be conducted in Franklin Circuit Court or in the Circuit Court for the county in which the contribution or expenditure constituting a campaign finance violation was solicited, made, or accepted. The prosecution of a person who unlawfully solicits, makes, or accepts a contribution or expenditure through the use of the mail may be conducted in the Circuit Court for the county in which the solicitation is mailed, the county in which the contribution is mailed or received, or the county in which the expenditure is mailed.

Any person directly involved or affected by an action of the registry which is final, other than of a determination to refer a violation to the Attorney General or appropriate Commonwealth’s or county attorney for prosecution, may seek judicial review of the action within thirty (30) days after the date of the action.

If judicial review is sought of any action of the registry relating to a pending election, the matter shall be advanced on the docket of the court. The court may take any steps authorized by law to accelerate its procedures so as to permit a timely decision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 253, § 3; 1980, ch. 292, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 100, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, §§ 19, 42, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, § 46, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 458, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 109, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Because of the similarity in
the substance of 1988 Acts ch. 341, § 19, and the last sentence
of (3) of this section, 1988 Acts ch. 341, § 19 has been treated
as an amendment rather than a newly created section.